Idaho statutes. Title 36 FISH AND GAME
Chapter 10
STATE BOUNDARY WATERS — RECIPROCAL AGREEMENTS

Sec.

§ 36-1001. Idaho, Oregon, Washington boundary waters — Snake River — Reciprocity.

Oregon, Idaho Boundary Waters. The right to fish, hunt, or trap in the waters or on the islands of the Snake River where said river forms the boundary line between the state of Oregon and the state of Idaho by the holder of either a valid Oregon or Idaho license therefor in accordance with the laws and rules of the respective state is hereby recognized and made lawful.

Washington, Idaho Boundary Waters. The right to fish or hunt in the waters or on the islands of the Snake River where said river forms the boundary line between the state of Idaho and the state of Washington by the holder of a valid Idaho or Washington license therefor in accordance with the fish and game laws of the respective state is hereby recognized and made lawful.

Purpose and Limitation. The purpose of this section is to avoid the conflict, confusion and difficulty of an attempt to find the exact locations of the state boundary in or on said waters and on said islands of the Snake River. Provided, however, nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize:

The holder of an Oregon or Washington license to fish, hunt or trap on the shoreline, sloughs or tributaries on the Idaho side of the Snake River, except by agreement as provided for in section 36-1003(b), Idaho Code.

The holder of an Idaho license to angle, hunt or trap on the shoreline, sloughs or tributaries on the Oregon or Washington side of the Snake River, except by agreement as provided for in section 36-1003(b), Idaho Code.

The holder of licenses for both Idaho and Oregon or for both Idaho and Washington to exercise the privileges of both such licenses at the same time.

§ 36-1002. Enforcement.

For the purposes of enforcing the provisions of section 36-1001, Idaho Code, the courts of this state sitting in the various counties contiguous to said waters, and the officers of this state empowered to enforce laws pertaining to fish or game are hereby given and shall have jurisdiction over the entire boundary waters aforesaid to the furthermost shoreline. Concurrent jurisdiction with the courts and administrative officers of the states of Washington and Oregon over the said boundary waters is hereby expressly recognized and established.

§ 36-1003. Bear Lake, Snake River — Reciprocal recognition of licensing rights — Idaho, Washington, Oregon and Utah.

Bear Lake. The commission is authorized to enter into reciprocal agreements with the Utah fish and game commission for the purpose of recognizing license rights of both Idaho and Utah fishing license holders to fish in the waters of Bear Lake, whether or not the said waters are within the state of Idaho or the state of Utah.

Snake River. 1. Oregon Fish and Game Commission. The commission is authorized to enter into reciprocal agreements with the Oregon fish and game commission for the purpose of recognizing license rights of Idaho and Oregon fishing license holders to fish in the waters of the Snake River where those waters form the boundary line between Idaho and Oregon.

2. Washington Game Commission. The commission is authorized to enter into reciprocal agreements with the Washington game commission for the purpose of recognizing license rights of Idaho and Washington fishing license holders to fish in the waters of the Snake River where those waters form the boundary line between Idaho and Washington.

§ 36-1004. Violations a misdemeanor.

Any person violating the provisions of this chapter or regulations made pursuant thereto shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

§ 36-1005. Bear Lake watershed — Cooperative agreements with Utah and Wyoming authorized.

The Idaho fish and game commission is authorized to enter into cooperative agreements with the Utah and Wyoming fish and game commissions for the purpose of development, construction, and maintenance of the fishing resources of the Bear Lake watershed.

§ 36-1006. State boundary lands — Reciprocity — Purpose — Cooperative agreements authorized — Enforcement.

The right to hunt big game in herd units where the herd unit incorporates the boundary line between a contiguous state and the state of Idaho by the holder of either a valid contiguous state or Idaho license therefor in accordance with the laws and rules of the respective state is hereby recognized and made lawful.

The purpose of this section is to avoid the conflict, confusion and difficulty of an attempt to find the exact locations of the state boundary while hunting big game, and to allow management of big game resources which cross state boundaries. Provided, however, nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize:

The holder of a contiguous state big game hunting license to hunt in Idaho outside of a defined boundary herd unit subject to reciprocal hunting.

The holder of an Idaho big game hunting license to hunt in a contiguous state outside of a defined boundary herd unit subject to reciprocal hunting.

The holder of licenses for both Idaho and a contiguous state to exercise the privileges of both such licenses at the same time.

The director is authorized to enter into reciprocal agreements with the directors of fish and game departments of contiguous states for the purpose of recognizing license rights of both Idaho and contiguous state big game hunting license holders to hunt in herd units which incorporate the boundary line between the state of Idaho and a contiguous state, whether or not said lands are within the state of Idaho or the contiguous state.

For the purposes of enforcing the provisions of this section, the courts of this state sitting in the various counties which incorporate boundary herd units, and the officers of this state empowered to enforce laws pertaining to fish and game are hereby given and shall have jurisdiction over the entire boundary herd unit. Concurrent jurisdiction with the court and administrative officers of contiguous states over said boundary herd units is hereby expressly recognized and established.